Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Ordinances

6-2-101. Publication of ordinances.

Each ordinance, or the caption of each ordinance, shall be published after its final passage in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. No ordinance shall take effect until the ordinance or its caption is published.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 6-2-101 — 6-2-104 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 16, 24, 32; Shan., §§ 1925, 1928, 1936; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3341, 3344, 3352; Acts 1970, ch. 426, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-201, 6-213, 6-216; Acts 1982, ch. 715, § 2; 1984, ch. 811, § 1), concerning mayor-aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Election of aldermen under mayor-aldermanic charter, OAG 05-124, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 126 (8/15/05).

6-2-102. Ordinance procedure.

An ordinance shall be considered and adopted on two (2) separate days; any other form of board action shall be considered and adopted in one (1) day. Any form of board action shall be passed by a majority of the members present, if there is a quorum. A quorum is a majority of the members to which the board is entitled. All ayes and nays on all votes on all forms of board action shall be recorded.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1998, ch. 621, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 6-2-101 — 6-2-104 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 16, 24, 32; Shan., §§ 1925, 1928, 1936; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3341, 3344, 3352; Acts 1970, ch. 426, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-201, 6-213, 6-216; Acts 1982, ch. 715, § 2; 1984, ch. 811, § 1), concerning mayor-aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-2-103. Annual operating budget and budgetary comparisons — Publication.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governing body shall publish the annual operating budget and budgetary comparisons of the proposed budget with the prior year's actual figures and the current year's estimated figures, which information shall include the following:

Revenues and expenditures for the following governmental funds: general, streets/public works, general purpose school and debt service;

Revenues for each fund shall be listed separately by local taxes, state of Tennessee, federal government and other sources;

Expenditures for each fund shall be listed separately by salaries and other costs;

Beginning and ending fund balances shall be shown for each fund; and

The number of full-time equivalent employee positions shall be shown for each fund.

The publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation and shall be published not less than ten (10) days prior to the meeting where the governing body will consider final passage of the budget.

Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 8; 1992, ch. 760, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 6-2-101 — 6-2-104 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 16, 24, 32; Shan., §§ 1925, 1928, 1936; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3341, 3344, 3352; Acts 1970, ch. 426, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-201, 6-213, 6-216; Acts 1982, ch. 715, § 2; 1984, ch. 811, § 1), concerning mayor-aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-2-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 6-2-101 — 6-2-104 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 16, 24, 32; Shan., §§ 1925, 1928, 1936; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3341, 3344, 3352; Acts 1970, ch. 426, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-201, 6-213, 6-216; Acts 1982, ch. 715, § 2; 1984, ch. 811, § 1), concerning mayor-aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-2-105. Ordinances prior to June 30, 1991 ratified.

All ordinances adopted on or prior to June 30, 1991, are hereby ratified and confirmed.

Acts 1992, ch. 612, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to city chartered under private act, OAG 95-124, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (12/22/95).